North Dakota, session 69, HB1193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - ATTORNEY GENERAL - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND
IMPROVEMENTS FUND - PEACE OFFICER AND CORRECTIONAL OFFICER APPRECIATION
GRANT PROGRAM - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT REPORT - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is
appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment and improvements fund in the state
treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $3,500,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the attorney general for the purpose of a peace officer and correctional officer
appreciation grant program, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The
attorney general shall provide grants to each city and county law enforcement agency in the state
based on the proportional number of licensed peace officers and correctional officers employed by the
city or county law enforcement agency compared to the total number of licensed peace officers and
correctional officers employed by all city and county law enforcement agencies. Of the funding available
for this program, a sum of at least $750,000 must be granted to city and county law enforcement
agencies employing ten or fewer employees working in a law enforcement capacity. Funding
appropriated in this section must be used for providing retention bonuses to current law enforcement
and correctional officers and providing tuition and fee payments on behalf of law enforcement trainees.
During the 2025-26 interim, the attorney general shall provide a report to the legislative management
regarding the use and effectiveness of grant funds, the number of grants provided, the average amount
of bonuses provided by city and county law enforcement agencies and correctional facilities, and other
program outcomes under this section. The appropriation in this section is considered a one-time funding
item.

H. B. NO. 1193 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1193.
House Vote: Yeas 77 Nays 14 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 5 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State